Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-112
Board; professional conduct; rules and regulations.

The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations of professional conduct appropriate to establish and maintain a high standard of integrity and dignity in the profession of public accountancy and to govern the administration and enforcement of the Public Accountancy Act. The rules and regulations shall be adopted and promulgated pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 7, p. 58;

Laws 1993, LB 41, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 10.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

The Nebraska State Board of Public Accountancy may use its rulemaking authority under this section to promulgate standards and procedures whereby the character and fitness of an applicant for initial certification may be considered by the board in determining whether the applicant is a qualified person under section 1-105.01. Troshynski v. Nebraska State Bd. of Pub. Accountancy, 270 Neb. 347, 701 N.W.2d 379 (2005).